Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.160

Crosswalk.

"Crosswalk" means the portion of the roadway between the intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by a marked crosswalk.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.160. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 17; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]